Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 2. Nuisances

Cross references. —

As to gambling devices being subject to seizure, see §

6-7-103

.

As to abatement of actions for nuisances upon death of either or both parties, see §

1-4-102

.

As to recovery of cost in actions for nuisances, see §

1-14-125

.

As to general powers of cities and towns to declare and abate nuisances, see §

15-1-103

.

As to all outdoor advertising not conforming with the Outdoor Advertising Act constituting public nuisances, see §

24-10-102

.

For provision that display of unauthorized signs shall constitute a nuisance and as to removal thereof without notice, see §

31-5-406

.

As to operation of a crematorium in violation of statutes or regulations as constituting a public nuisance, see §

33-16-409

.

As to junkyards which do not conform to the Junkyard Control Act as public nuisances, see §

33-19-102

.

As to injunctions to abate junkyards which are nuisances, see §

33-19-107

.

As to penalty for failure to remove nuisance after notice, see §

35-1-105

.

As to powers and duties of director of public health relative to abatement of nuisances, see §

35-1-240

.

As to certain structures declared nuisances, see §

35-9-111

.

For duty of county commissioners as to abatement of nuisances in unincorporated cities or towns, see §

35-9-406

.

As to disposing of garbage so as to constitute a nuisance, see §

35-10-101

.

For provision declaring the violation of §

35-10-302

, relative to the storage of explosives, a nuisance, see §

35-10-303

.

For provision declaring the obstructing or injuring of highways, bridges, streams, and sewers a nuisance, see §

35-10-401

.

For additional authority of cities and towns to regulate nuisances in connection with public health and safety, see §

35-10-408

.

As to holding an assembly of people as constituting a public nuisance, see §

35-15-111

.

As to cancellation of leases in connection with Hot Springs state park for refusal or failure to comply with statutes or orders defining and publishing nuisances, see §

36-8-309

.

Cited

in

Weiss v. State ex rel. Cardine, 455 P.2d 904,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1969).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Massage parlor as nuisance, 80 ALR3d 1020.

Bells, carillons and the like as nuisance, 95 ALR3d 1268.

Windmill as nuisance, 36 ALR4th 1159.

Telephone calls as nuisance, 53 ALR4th 1153.

Legal aspects of speed bumps, 60 ALR4th 1249.

Encroachment of trees, shrubbery or other vegetation across boundary line, 65 ALR4th 603.

Business interruption, without physical damage, as actionable, 65 ALR4th 1126.

What constitutes special injury that entitles private party to maintain action based on public nuisance — modern cases, 71 ALR4th 13.

§ 6-6-201.
“Nuisance” defined.

Whoever maintains, uses, owns or leases any structure, boat or vehicle for the purpose of lewdness, assignation, prostitution or gambling, or for manufacture, possession, sale or disposition of intoxicating liquor or any controlled substance in violation of law, is guilty of a nuisance, and the structure, boat or vehicle and the ground upon which the structure is situated and the furniture, fixtures, musical instruments, gambling devices, and instruments of every kind or nature, and contents, are also declared a nuisance, and shall be enjoined and abated.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to houses of ill fame and prostitution generally, see §

6-4-103

.

As to gambling and lotteries generally, see §§

6-7-102

,

6-7-103

.

As to alcoholic beverages generally, see title 12.

As to controlled substances, see §

35-7-1001

et seq.

To constitute place common nuisance because of liquor being kept

there, it had to be kept for sale. State v. Crump, 35 Wyo. 41, 246 P. 241,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1926).

Control required over alleged nuisance. —

Although defendant's name remained on the liquor license of a lounge, the undisputed facts demonstrated that the defendants neither owned, controlled, maintained nor leased the lounge at the time plaintiff was injured, and because the defendants had sold the lounge under a contract, they would have had to resort to legal proceedings to assert any significant control over the establishment; therefore, no action in nuisance would lie against the defendants because they had no control over the alleged nuisance. Dubray v. Howshar, 884 P.2d 23,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1994).

Applied

in

Weiss v. State ex rel. Leimback, 435 P.2d 280,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1967).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Cone v. Bernweiser, 39 Wyo. 314, 271 P. 13,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(1928).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sale and use of intoxicating liquors at public dance as nuisance, 44 ALR2d 1381.

Admissibility of evidence of general reputation of premises, 68 ALR2d 1300.

Saloons or taverns as nuisance, 5 ALR3d 989.

Exhibition of obscene motion pictures as nuisance, 50 ALR3d 969.

Pornoshops or similar places disseminating obscene materials as nuisance, 58 ALR3d 1134.

§ 6-6-202.
Abatement by injunction; suit by county attorney or citizen; petition; temporary injunction; notice to defendant; issuance and effect of injunction.

Whenever a nuisance exists as defined in this article, the county attorney or any citizen of the county may maintain an action in the name of the state of Wyoming upon the relation of the county attorney or citizen, to perpetually enjoin the nuisance, the person maintaining the nuisance, and the owner or agent of the building or ground upon which the nuisance exists. In the action, the court shall, upon the presentation of a petition alleging that the nuisance complained of exists, allow a temporary writ of injunction without bond, if it appears to the satisfaction of the court by evidence in the form of affidavits, depositions, oral testimony or otherwise. Three (3) days notice in writing shall be given the defendant of the application, and, if then continued at his instance, the writ as prayed shall be granted as a matter of course. When an injunction has been granted, it shall be binding on the defendant throughout the judicial district in which it was issued, and any violation of the provisions of injunction shall be a contempt.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to injunctions generally, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P. and §§

1-28-101

through

1-28-111

.

Purpose of temporary injunction. —

Purpose of a temporary injunction is to preserve the status quo until the merits of an action can be determined. Weiss v. State, 434 P.2d 761,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1967).

Award of temporary injunction is extraordinary remedy

which will not be granted except upon a clear showing of probable success and possible irreparable injury to the plaintiff, lest the proper freedom of action of the defendant be circumscribed when no wrong has been committed. Weiss v. State, 434 P.2d 761,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1967).

Temporary injunction rests upon alleged existence of emergency,

or a special reason for such an order, before the case can be regularly heard. Weiss v. State, 434 P.2d 761,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1967).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Patterson v. Longpre & Cameron, 35 Wyo. 482, 251 P. 468,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1926); State ex rel. Cone v. Bernweiser, 39 Wyo. 314, 271 P. 13,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(1928); Weiss v. State ex rel. Leimback, 435 P.2d 280,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1967).

Cited

in

Bird v. State, 36 Wyo. 532, 257 P. 2,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(1927).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of employee to injunction preventing employer from exposing employee to tobacco smoke in workplace, 37 ALR4th 480.

§ 6-6-203.
Trial; evidence of general reputation; dismissal or prosecution of action; substitution of complainant; costs.

The action, when brought, shall be triable at the first term of court after due and timely service of the notice has been given. In the action evidence of the general reputation of the place is admissible for the purpose of proving the existence of the nuisance. If the complaint is filed by a citizen, it shall not be dismissed except upon a sworn statement made by the complainant and his attorney, setting forth the reason why the action should be dismissed, and the dismissal approved by the county attorney in writing or in open court. If the court finds the action ought not to be dismissed, he may direct the county attorney to prosecute the action to judgment. If the action is continued more than one (1) term of court, any citizen of the county or the county attorney may be substituted for the complaining party and prosecute the action to judgment. If the action is brought by a citizen and the court finds there was no reasonable ground or cause for the action, the costs may be taxed to the citizen.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Applied

in

Weiss v. State ex rel. Danigan, 434 P.2d 761,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1967).

§ 6-6-204.
Order of abatement; removal and sale of movable property; closing of building; breaking and entering closed building; fees.

If the existence of the nuisance is established in an action as provided in this article, or in a criminal proceeding, an order of abatement shall be entered as a part of the judgment in the case. The order shall direct the removal from the building or place of all fixtures, furniture, musical instruments or movable property contained therein used in conducting the nuisance, and shall direct the sale thereof in the manner provided for the sale of personal property under execution, and shall order the closure of the structure or place against the use for a period specified by the court. If any person breaks and enters or uses a structure or place directed to be closed, he shall be punished as provided in W.S.

6-6-208

. For removing and selling the movable property, the officer shall be entitled to receive the same fees as he would for levying upon and selling like property on execution. For closing the premises and keeping them closed, a reasonable sum shall be allowed by the court.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to executions and stay of executions, see §§

1-17-101

through

1-17-210

.

As to enforcement of lien of judgment by execution, see §§

1-17-301

through

1-17-345

.

As to proceedings in aid of execution, see §§

1-17-401

through

1-17-418

.

As to enforcement of foreign judgments, see §§

1-17-701

through

1-17-707

.

Applied

in

Weiss v. State ex rel. Danigan, 434 P.2d 761,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1967).

§ 6-6-205.
Disposition of proceeds of sale.

The proceeds of the sale of the personal property, as provided in W.S.

6-6-204

, shall be applied in payment of the costs of the action and abatement, and the balance, if any, shall be paid to the defendant.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

§ 6-6-206.
Cancellation of closing order and release of property upon payment of costs, filing of bond and promised abatement of nuisance; effect of release.

If the owner appears and pays all costs of the proceeding, and files a bond with sureties to be approved by the clerk in the full value of the property, as specified by the court, conditioned that he will immediately abate the nuisance and prevent recurrence of the nuisance for a time specified by the court, the court may, if satisfied of his good faith, cancel the order of abatement as it relates to the property. The release of the property under this section shall not release it from any judgment, lien or liability to which it may be subject by law.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Stated

in

Weiss v. State ex rel. Danigan, 434 P.2d 761,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1967).

§ 6-6-207.
Assessment of tax when permanent injunction issues; collection; continuing liability for other penalties.

Whenever a permanent injunction issues against any person for maintaining a nuisance or against the owner or agent of any building kept or used for the purposes prohibited by this article, there shall be assessed against the building and the ground upon which it is located and against the person or persons maintaining the nuisance, and the owner or agent of the premises, a tax of three hundred dollars ($300.00). The assessment of the tax shall be made by the assessor of the county in which the nuisance exists and shall be made within three (3) months from the date of granting of the permanent injunction. If the assessor fails or neglects to make the assessment, it shall be made by the sheriff of the county and a return of the assessment shall be made to the county treasurer. The tax may be enforced and collected in the manner prescribed for the collection of taxes under the general revenue laws and shall be a perpetual lien upon all property, both personal and real used for the purpose of maintaining the nuisance. The payment of the tax does not relieve the person or building from any other penalties provided by law and when collected shall be applied and distributed in the manner prescribed by law for the application and distribution of monies arising from the collection of fines and penalties in criminal cases.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to disposition of fines, see §

6-10-108

.

As to assessment, levy and collection of taxes generally, see chapters 11 and 13 in title 39.

§ 6-6-208.
Contempt proceedings for violation of injunction; commencement; trial; penalties.

If any injunction granted under this article is violated, the court may summarily try and punish the offender. The proceedings shall be commenced by filing with the clerk of the court an information under oath, setting out the alleged facts constituting the violation, upon which the court shall cause a warrant to issue, under which the defendant shall be arrested. The trial may be had upon affidavits, or either party may demand the production and oral examination of the witnesses. A party found guilty of contempt under this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to criminal contempt, see Rule 42, W.R. Cr. P.

Contempt proceeding is summary in nature and sui generis in character.

Weiss v. State, 455 P.2d 904,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1969), cert. denied, 398 U.S. 927, 90 S. Ct. 1815, 26 L. Ed. 2d 89, 1970 U.S. LEXIS 1748 (U.S. 1970).

And not “criminal case.” —

Proceeding against defendant in connection with a citation for contempt was not a “criminal case” within the meaning of that term as used in art. 1, § 9, Wyo. Const.Weiss v. State, 455 P.2d 904,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1969), cert. denied, 398 U.S. 927, 90 S. Ct. 1815, 26 L. Ed. 2d 89, 1970 U.S. LEXIS 1748 (U.S. 1970).

Single violation of injunction order makes defendant liable

for contempt. Tucker v. State, 35 Wyo. 430, 251 P. 460,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1926).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-6-209.
“Public nuisance” defined; maintenance thereof; penalty.

Every structure, boat or vehicle used and occupied as a house of ill fame, or for purposes of prostitution or gambling, or for the purpose of manufacture, possession, sale or disposition of intoxicating liquor or any controlled substance in violation of law shall be held and deemed a public nuisance. Any person owning, or having the control of the property, and knowingly leasing or subletting the property, in whole or in part, for the purpose of keeping a house or place of ill fame, prostitution or gambling, or for the purpose of manufacture, possession, sale or disposition of intoxicating liquor or any controlled substance in violation of law, or knowingly permitting the property to be used or occupied for that purpose, or using or occupying the property for that purpose, shall for every offense be fined not exceeding seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or be imprisoned in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to houses of ill fame and prostitution generally, see §

6-4-103

.

As to gambling generally, see §§

6-7-102

,

6-7-103

.

As to alcoholic beverages, see title 12.

As to controlled substances, see §

35-7-1001

et seq.

Control required over alleged nuisance. —

Although defendant's name remained on the liquor license of a lounge, the undisputed facts demonstrated that the defendants neither owned, controlled, maintained nor leased the lounge at the time plaintiff was injured, and because the defendants had sold the lounge under a contract, they would have had to resort to legal proceedings to assert any significant control over the establishment; therefore, no action in nuisance would lie against the defendants because they had no control over the alleged nuisance. Dubray v. Howshar, 884 P.2d 23,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).